Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,199
Facility, defined.

Facility means the buildings, equipment, structures, and other stationary items located on a single site or on contiguous or adjacent sites and owned or operated by the same person or by any person which controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with such person.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 9.